Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-1001
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-1001 to 79-1033 shall be known and may be cited as the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 542, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 840, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3801;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 652;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 29;

Laws 1998, LB 1134, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1219, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 149, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 833, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 1091, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 71;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 12;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 3;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB5, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB18, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB519, § 10;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 31.